North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 25. Dispositions.
§ 7B-2508.1.
Criminal gang activity.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Criminal gang. — Any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, that (i) has as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal or delinquent acts and (ii) shares a common name, identification, signs, symbols, tattoos, graffiti, attire, or other distinguishing characteristics, including common activities, customs, or behaviors. The term shall not include three or more persons associated in fact, whether formal or informal, who are not engaged in criminal gang activity.

Criminal gang activity. — The commission of, attempted commission of, or solicitation, coercion, or intimidation of another person to commit (i) any offense under Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or (ii) any offense under Chapter 14 of the General Statutes except Article 9, 22A, 40, 46, or 59 thereof, and further excepting

G.S. 14-82

, 14-145, 14-183, 14-184, 14-186, 14-190.9, 14-247, 14-248, or 14-313 thereof, and either of the following conditions is met:

The offense is committed with the intent to benefit, promote, or further the interests of a criminal gang or for the purposes of increasing a person’s own standing or position within a criminal gang.

The participants in the offense are identified as criminal gang members acting individually or collectively to further any criminal purpose of a criminal gang.

Criminal gang member. — Any person who meets three or more of the following criteria:

The person admits to being a member of a criminal gang.

The person is identified as a criminal gang member by a reliable source, including a parent or a guardian.

The person has been previously involved in criminal gang activity.

The person has adopted symbols, hand signs, or graffiti associated with a criminal gang.

The person has adopted the display of colors or the style of dress associated with a criminal gang.

The person is in possession of or linked to a criminal gang by physical evidence, including photographs, ledgers, rosters, written or electronic communications, or membership documents.

The person has tattoos or markings associated with a criminal gang.

The person has adopted language or terminology associated with a criminal gang.

The person appears in any form of social media to promote a criminal gang.

History.

2017-57, s. 16D.4(hh); 2017-197, s. 5.4; 2018-142, s. 23(b).

§ 7B-2509.
Registration of certain delinquent juveniles.

In any case in which a juvenile, who was at least 11 years of age at the time of the offense, is adjudicated delinquent for committing a violation of

G.S. 14-27.6

(attempted rape or sexual offense),

G.S. 14-27.21

(first-degree forcible rape),

G.S. 14-27.22

(second-degree forcible rape),

G.S. 14-27.24

(first-degree statutory rape),

G.S. 14-27.26

(first-degree forcible sexual offense),

G.S. 14-27.27

(second-degree forcible sexual offense), or

G.S. 14-27.29

(first-degree statutory sexual offense), the judge, upon a finding that the juvenile is a danger to the community, may order that the juvenile register in accordance with Part 4 of Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.

History.

1997-516, s. 1A; 1998-202, s. 11; 2015-181, s. 26.

§ 7B-2510.
Conditions of probation; violation of probation.

In any case where a juvenile is placed on probation pursuant to G.S. 7B-2506(8), the juvenile court counselor shall have the authority to visit the juvenile where the juvenile resides. The court may impose conditions of probation that are related to the needs of the juvenile and that are reasonably necessary to ensure that the juvenile will lead a law-abiding life, including:

That the juvenile shall remain on good behavior.

That the juvenile shall not violate any laws.

That the juvenile shall not violate any reasonable and lawful rules of a parent, guardian, or custodian.

That the juvenile attend school regularly.

That the juvenile maintain passing grades in up to four courses during each grading period and meet with the juvenile court counselor and a representative of the school to make a plan for how to maintain those passing grades.

That the juvenile not associate with specified persons or be in specified places.

That the juvenile:

Refrain from use or possession of any controlled substance included in any schedule of Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, the Controlled Substances Act;

Refrain from use or possession of any alcoholic beverage regulated under Chapter 18B of the General Statutes; and

Submit to random drug testing.

That the juvenile abide by a prescribed curfew.

That the juvenile submit to a warrantless search at reasonable times.

That the juvenile possess no firearm, explosive device, or other deadly weapon.

That the juvenile report to a juvenile court counselor as often as required by the juvenile court counselor.

That the juvenile make specified financial restitution or pay a fine in accordance with G.S. 7B-2506(4), (5), and (22).

That the juvenile be employed regularly if not attending school.

That the juvenile satisfy any other conditions determined appropriate by the court.

In addition to the regular conditions of probation specified in subsection (a) of this section, the court may, at a dispositional hearing or any subsequent hearing, order the juvenile to comply, if directed to comply by the chief court counselor, with one or more of the following conditions:

Perform up to 20 hours of community service;

Submit to substance abuse monitoring and treatment;

Participate in a life skills or an educational skills program administered by the Division;

Cooperate with electronic monitoring; and

Cooperate with intensive supervision.

However, the court shall not give the chief court counselor discretion to impose the conditions of either subsection (4) or (5) of this section unless the juvenile is subject to Level 2 dispositions pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2508

or subsection (d) of this section.

An order of probation shall remain in force for a period not to exceed one year from the date entered. Prior to expiration of an order of probation, the court may extend it for an additional period of one year after notice and a hearing, if the court finds that the extension is necessary to protect the community or to safeguard the welfare of the juvenile. At the discretion of the court, the hearing to determine to extend probation may occur after the expiration of an order of probation at the next regularly scheduled court date or if the juvenile fails to appear in court.

On motion of the juvenile court counselor or the juvenile, or on the court’s own motion, the court may review the progress of any juvenile on probation at any time during the period of probation or at the end of probation. The conditions or duration of probation may be modified only as provided in this Subchapter and only after notice and a hearing.

If the court, after notice and a hearing, finds by the greater weight of the evidence that the juvenile has violated the conditions of probation set by the court, the court may continue the original conditions of probation, modify the conditions of probation, or, except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, order a new disposition. In the court’s discretion, the court may order a new disposition at the next higher level on the disposition chart or order a term of confinement in a secure juvenile detention facility for up to twice the term authorized by

G.S. 7B-2508

, in addition to any other Level 2 dispositional option.

A court shall not order a Level 3 disposition for violation of the conditions of probation by a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for an offense classified as minor under

G.S. 7B-2508

.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 20; 1991, c. 353, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 4; 1993, c. 369, s. 1; c. 462, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-490, ss. 2.23, 2.24; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2015-58, s. 2.4.

§ 7B-2511.
Termination of probation.

At the end of or at any time during probation, the court may terminate probation by written order upon finding that there is no further need for supervision. The finding and order terminating probation may be entered in chambers in the absence of the juvenile and may be based on a report from the juvenile court counselor or, at the election of the court, the order may be entered with the juvenile present after notice and a hearing.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2001-490, s. 2.25.

§ 7B-2512.
Dispositional order.

The dispositional order shall be in writing and shall contain appropriate findings of fact and conclusions of law. The court shall state with particularity, both orally and in the written order of disposition, the precise terms of the disposition including the kind, duration, and the person who is responsible for carrying out the disposition and the person or agency in whom custody is vested.

The court shall include information at the time of issuing the dispositional order, either orally in court or in writing, on the expunction of juvenile records as provided for in

G.S. 7B-3200

that are applicable to the dispositional order.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 10; 1991, c. 434, s. 1; 1997-390, s. 8; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 7; 2015-58, s. 2.5.

§ 7B-2513.
Commitment of delinquent juvenile to Division.

Pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2506

and

G.S. 7B-2508

, the court may commit a delinquent juvenile who is at least 10 years of age to the Division for placement in a youth development center. Commitment shall be for an indefinite term of at least six months.

(a1)

For an offense the juvenile committed prior to reaching the age of 16 years, the term shall not exceed:

The twenty-first birthday of the juvenile if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be first-degree murder pursuant to

G.S. 14-17

, first-degree forcible rape pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.21

, first-degree statutory rape pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.24

, first-degree forcible sexual offense pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.26

, or first-degree statutory sexual offense pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.29

if committed by an adult;

The nineteenth birthday of the juvenile if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be a Class B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult, other than an offense set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection; or

The eighteenth birthday of the juvenile if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense other than an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult.

(a2)

For an offense the juvenile committed while the juvenile was at least 16 years of age but less than 17 years of age, the term shall not exceed:

(1)

The twenty-first birthday of the juvenile if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be first degree murder pursuant to

G.S. 14-17

, first-degree forcible rape pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.21

, first-degree statutory rape pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.24

, first-degree forcible sexual offense pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.26

, or first-degree statutory sexual offense pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.29

if committed by an adult;

(2)

The twentieth birthday of the juvenile if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be a Class B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult, other than an offense set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection; or

(3)

The juvenile’s nineteenth birthday if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense other than an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult.

(a3)

For an offense the juvenile committed while the juvenile was at least 17 years of age, the term shall not exceed:

(1)

The twenty-first birthday of the juvenile if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult; or

(2)

The juvenile’s twentieth birthday if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense other than an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult.

(a4)

No juvenile shall be committed to a youth development center beyond the minimum six-month commitment for a period of time in excess of the maximum term of imprisonment for which an adult in prior record level VI for felonies or in prior conviction level III for misdemeanors could be sentenced for the same offense, except when the Division pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2515

determines that the juvenile’s commitment needs to be continued for an additional period of time to continue care or treatment under the plan of care or treatment developed under subsection (f) of this section. At the time of commitment to a youth development center, the court shall determine the maximum period of time the juvenile may remain committed before a determination must be made by the Division pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2515

and shall notify the juvenile of that determination.

The court may commit a juvenile to a definite term of not less than six months and not more than two years if the court finds that the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, has been previously adjudicated delinquent for two or more felony offenses, and has been previously committed to a youth development center.

The chief court counselor shall have the responsibility for transporting the juvenile to the youth development center designated by the Division. The juvenile shall be accompanied to the youth development center by a person of the same sex.

The chief court counselor shall ensure that the records requested by the Division accompany the juvenile upon transportation for admittance to a youth development center or, if not obtainable at the time of admission, are sent to the youth development center within 15 days of the admission. If records requested by the Division for admission do not exist, to the best knowledge of the chief court counselor, the chief court counselor shall so stipulate in writing to the youth development center. If such records do exist, but the chief court counselor is unable to obtain copies of them, a district court may order that the records from public agencies be made available to the youth development center. Records that are confidential by law shall remain confidential and the Division shall be bound by the specific laws governing the confidentiality of these records. All records shall be used in a manner consistent with the best interests of the juvenile.

A commitment order accompanied by information requested by the Division shall be forwarded to the Division. The Division shall place the juvenile in the youth development center that would best provide for the juvenile’s needs and shall notify the committing court. The Division may assign a juvenile committed for delinquency to any institution of the Division or licensed by the Division, which program is appropriate to the needs of the juvenile.The Division, after assessment of the juvenile, may provide commitment services to the juvenile in a program not located in a youth development center or detention facility. If the Division recommends that commitment services for the juvenile are to be provided in a setting that is not located in a youth development center or detention facility, the Division shall file a motion, along with information about the recommended services for the juvenile, with the committing court prior to placing the juvenile in the identified commitment program. The Division shall send notice of the motion to the District Attorney, the juvenile, and the juvenile’s attorney. Upon receipt of the motion filed by the Division, the court may enter an order without the appearance of witnesses and without hearing if the court determines that the identified commitment program is appropriate and a hearing is not necessary. The court must hold a hearing if the juvenile or the juvenile’s attorney requests a hearing. If the court notifies the Division of its intent to hold a hearing, the date for that hearing shall be set by the court and the Division shall place the juvenile in a youth development center or detention facility until the determination of the court at that hearing.

When the court commits a juvenile to the Division for placement in a youth development center, the Division shall prepare a plan for care or treatment within 30 days after assuming custody of the juvenile.

Commitment of a juvenile to the Division for placement in a youth development center does not terminate the court’s continuing jurisdiction over the juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian. Commitment of a juvenile to the Division for placement in a youth development center transfers only physical custody of the juvenile. Legal custody remains with the parent, guardian, custodian, agency, or institution in whom it was vested.

Pending placement of a juvenile with the Division, the court may house a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult in a holdover facility up to 72 hours if the court, based on the information provided by the juvenile court counselor, determines that no acceptable alternative placement is available and the protection of the public requires that the juvenile be housed in a holdover facility.

A juvenile who is committed to the Division for placement in a youth development center shall be tested for the use of controlled substances or alcohol. The results of this initial test shall be incorporated into the plan of care as provided in subsection (f) of this section and used for evaluation and treatment purposes only.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-216, s. 15, effective August 31, 2019, and applicable to offenses and acts of delinquency committed on or after that date.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1983, c. 133, s. 2; 1987, c. 100; c. 372; 1991, c. 434, ss. 2, 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-423, s. 1; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-95, s. 5; 2001-490, s. 2.26; 2003-53, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2015-181, s. 27; 2017-57, s. 16D.4(i); 2018-142, s. 23(b); 2019-216, s. 15; 2021-123, s. 1(a).

§ 7B-2514.
Post-release supervision planning; release.

The Division shall be responsible for evaluation of the progress of each juvenile at least once every six months as long as the juvenile remains in the care of the Division. Any determination that the juvenile should remain in the care of the Division for an additional period of time shall be based on the Division’s determination that the juvenile requires additional treatment or rehabilitation pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2515

. If the Division determines that a juvenile is ready for release, the Division shall initiate a post-release supervision planning process. The post-release supervision planning process shall be defined by rules and regulations of the Division, but shall include the following:

Written notification shall be given to the court that ordered commitment.

A post-release supervision planning conference shall be held involving as many as possible of the following: the juvenile, the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian, juvenile court counselors who have supervised the juvenile on probation or will supervise the juvenile on post-release supervision, and staff of the facility that found the juvenile ready for release. The planning conference shall include personal contact and evaluation rather than telephonic notification.

The planning conference participants shall consider, based on the individual needs of the juvenile and pursuant to rules adopted by the Division, placement of the juvenile in any program under the auspices of the Division, including the juvenile court services programs that, in the judgment of the Division, would be appropriate transitional placement, pending release under

G.S. 7B-2513

.

The Division shall develop the plan in writing and base the terms on the needs of the juvenile and the protection of the public. Every plan shall require the juvenile to complete at least 90 days, but not more than one year, of post-release supervision.

The Division shall release a juvenile under a plan of post-release supervision at least 90 days prior to one of the following:

Completion of the juvenile’s definite term of commitment.

The juvenile’s twenty-first birthday if the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be first-degree murder pursuant to

G.S. 14-17

, first-degree forcible rape pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.21

, first-degree statutory rape pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.24

, first-degree forcible sexual offense pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.26

, or first-degree statutory sexual offense pursuant to

G.S. 14-27.29

if committed by an adult.

If the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense that would be a Class B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult, other than an offense set forth in

G.S. 7B-1602(a)

:

The juvenile’s nineteenth birthday, if the juvenile committed the offense prior to reaching the age of 16 years.

The juvenile’s twentieth birthday, if the juvenile committed the offense while the juvenile was at least 16 years of age but less than 17 years of age.

The juvenile’s twenty-first birthday, if the juvenile committed the offense while the juvenile was at least 17 years of age.

If the juvenile has been committed to the Division for an offense other than an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult:

The eighteenth birthday of the juvenile, if the juvenile committed the offense prior to reaching the age of 16 years.

The nineteenth birthday of the juvenile, if the juvenile committed the offense while the juvenile was at least 16 years of age but less than 17 years of age.

The twentieth birthday of the juvenile, if the juvenile committed the offense while the juvenile was at least 17 years of age.

Notwithstanding Articles 30 and 31 of Subchapter III of this Chapter, and in addition to any notice to the victim required pursuant to

G.S. 7B-2055

, at least 45 days before releasing to post-release supervision a juvenile who was committed for a Class A or B1 felony, the Division shall notify by first-class mail at the last known address all of the following:

The juvenile.

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian.

The district attorney of the district where the juvenile was adjudicated.

The head of the enforcement agency that took the juvenile into custody.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-216, s. 11, effective August 31, 2019, and applicable to offenses and acts of delinquency committed on or after that date.The notification shall include only the juvenile’s name, offense, date of commitment, and date proposed for release. A copy of the notice shall be sent to the appropriate clerk of superior court for placement in the juvenile’s court file.

The Division may release a juvenile under an indefinite commitment to post-release supervision only after the juvenile has been committed to the Division for placement in a youth development center for a period of at least six months.

A juvenile committed to the Division for placement in a youth development center for a definite term shall receive credit toward that term for the time the juvenile spends on post-release supervision.

A juvenile on post-release supervision shall be supervised by a juvenile court counselor. Post-release supervision shall be terminated by order of the court.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1983, c. 133, s. 1; c. 276, s. 1; 1989, c. 235; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 23.2(e); 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-95, s. 5; 2001-490, ss. 2.27, 2.28; 2011-145, s. 19(l); 2015-181, s. 28; 2019-216, s. 11; 2021-123, s. 1(d).

§ 7B-2515.
Notification of extended commitment; plan of treatment.

In determining whether a juvenile who was committed to the Division for an offense that was committed prior to the juvenile reaching the age of 16 years should be released before the juvenile’s 18th birthday, the Division shall consider the protection of the public and the likelihood that continued placement will lead to further rehabilitation. If the Division does not intend to release the juvenile prior to the juvenile’s eighteenth birthday, or if the Division determines that the juvenile’s commitment should be continued beyond the maximum commitment period as set forth in G.S. 7B-2513(a4), the Division shall notify the juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian in writing at least 30 days in advance of the juvenile’s eighteenth birthday or the end of the maximum commitment period, of the additional specific commitment period proposed by the Division, the basis for extending the commitment period, and the plan for future care or treatment.

(a1)

In determining whether a juvenile who was committed to the Division for an offense that was committed while the juvenile was at least 16 years of age but less than 17 years of age should be released before the juvenile’s nineteenth birthday, the Division shall consider the protection of the public and the likelihood that continued placement will lead to further rehabilitation. If the Division does not intend to release the juvenile prior to the juvenile’s nineteenth birthday, or if the Division determines that the juvenile’s commitment should be continued beyond the maximum commitment period as set forth in G.S. 7B-2513(a4), the Division shall notify the juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian in writing, at least 30 days in advance of the juvenile’s nineteenth birthday or the end of the maximum commitment period, of the additional specific commitment period proposed by the Division, the basis for extending the commitment period, and the plan for future care or treatment.

(a2)

In determining whether a juvenile who was committed to the Division for an offense that was committed while the juvenile was at least 17 years of age but less than 18 years of age should be released before the juvenile’s twentieth birthday, the Division shall consider the protection of the public and the likelihood that continued placement will lead to further rehabilitation. If the Division does not intend to release the juvenile prior to the juvenile’s twentieth birthday, or if the Division determines that the juvenile’s commitment should be continued beyond the maximum commitment period as set forth in G.S. 7B-2513(a4), the Division shall notify the juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian in writing, at least 30 days in advance of the juvenile’s twentieth birthday or the end of the maximum commitment period, of the additional specific commitment period proposed by the Division, the basis for extending the commitment period, and the plan for future care or treatment.

The Division shall modify the plan of care or treatment developed pursuant to G.S. 7B-2513(f) to specify (i) the specific goals and outcomes that require additional time for care or treatment of the juvenile; (ii) the specific course of treatment or care that will be implemented to achieve the established goals and outcomes; and (iii) the efforts that will be taken to assist the juvenile’s family in creating an environment that will increase the likelihood that the efforts to treat and rehabilitate the juvenile will be successful upon release. If appropriate, the Division may place the juvenile in a setting other than a youth development center.

The juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian may request a review by the court of the Division’s decision to extend the juvenile’s commitment pursuant to this section, in which case the court shall conduct a review hearing. The court may modify the Division’s decision and the juvenile’s maximum commitment period. If the juvenile or the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian does not request a review of the Division’s decision, the Division’s decision shall become the juvenile’s new maximum commitment period.

History.

1998-202, s. 6; 1998-217, s. 57(1); 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-95, s. 5; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-57, s. 16D.4(j); 2018-142, s. 23(b).

§ 7B-2516.
Revocation of post-release supervision.

On motion of the juvenile court counselor providing post-release supervision or motion of the juvenile, or on the court’s own motion, and after notice, the court may hold a hearing to review the progress of any juvenile on post-release supervision at any time during the period of post-release supervision. With respect to any hearing involving allegations that the juvenile has violated the terms of post-release supervision, the juvenile:

Shall have reasonable notice in writing of the nature and content of the allegations in the motion, including notice that the purpose of the hearing is to determine whether the juvenile has violated the terms of post-release supervision to the extent that post-release supervision should be revoked;

Shall be represented by an attorney at the hearing;

Shall have the right to confront and cross-examine witnesses; and

May admit, deny, or explain the violation alleged and may present proof, including affidavits or other evidence, in support of the juvenile’s contentions. A record of the proceeding shall be made and preserved in the juvenile’s record.

If the court determines by the greater weight of the evidence that the juvenile has violated the terms of post-release supervision, the court may revoke the post-release supervision or make any other disposition authorized by this Subchapter.

If the court revokes post-release supervision, the juvenile shall be returned to the Division for placement in a youth development center for an indefinite term of at least 90 days, provided, however, that no juvenile shall remain committed to the Division for placement in a youth development center past the maximum term of commitment allowed pursuant to G.S. 7B-2513(a1), 7B-2513(a2), and 7B-2513(a3).

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s.3; 2001-95, s. 5; 2001-490, s. 2.29; 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2015-181, s. 29; 2021-123, s. 1(e).

§ 7B-2517.
Transfer authority of Governor. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Governor may order transfer of any person less than 18 years of age from any jail or penal facility of the State to one of the residential facilities operated by the Division in appropriate circumstances, provided the Governor shall consult with the Division concerning the feasibility of the transfer in terms of available space, staff, and suitability of program.

When an inmate, committed to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, is transferred by the Governor to a residential program operated by the Division, the Division may release the juvenile based on the needs of the juvenile and the best interests of the State. Transfer shall not divest the probation or parole officer of the officer’s responsibility to supervise the inmate on release.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), (l); 2017-186, s. 2(l).

§ 7B-2517.
Transfer authority of Governor. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Governor may order transfer of any person less than 18 years of age from any jail or penal facility of the State to one of the residential facilities operated by the Division in appropriate circumstances, provided the Governor shall consult with the Division concerning the feasibility of the transfer in terms of available space, staff, and suitability of program.

When an inmate, committed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, is transferred by the Governor to a residential program operated by the Division, the Division may release the juvenile based on the needs of the juvenile and the best interests of the State. Transfer shall not divest the probation or parole officer of the officer’s responsibility to supervise the inmate on release.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(h), (l); 2017-186, s. 2(l); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).